Idaho statutes. Title 7 SPECIAL PROCEEDINGS
Chapter 10 UNIFORM INTERSTATE FAMILY SUPPORT ACT
§ 7-1068. Foreign support agreement.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, a tribunal of this state shall recognize and enforce a foreign support agreement registered in this state.

An application or direct request for recognition and enforcement of a foreign support agreement must be accompanied by:

A complete text of the foreign support agreement; and

A record stating that the foreign support agreement is enforceable as an order of support in the issuing country.

A tribunal of this state may vacate the registration of a foreign support agreement only if, acting on its own motion, the tribunal finds that recognition and enforcement would be manifestly incompatible with public policy.

In a contest of a foreign support agreement, a tribunal of this state may refuse recognition and enforcement of the agreement if it finds:

Recognition and enforcement of the agreement is manifestly incompatible with public policy;

The agreement was obtained by fraud or falsification;

The agreement is incompatible with a support order involving the same parties and having the same purpose in this state, another state or a foreign country if the support order is entitled to recognition and enforcement under this chapter in this state; or

The record submitted under subsection (2) of this section lacks authenticity or integrity.

A proceeding for recognition and enforcement of a foreign support agreement must be suspended during the pendency of a challenge to or appeal of the agreement before a tribunal of another state or a foreign country.

§ 7-1069. Modification of convention child-support order.

A tribunal of this state may not modify a convention child-support order if the obligee remains a resident of the foreign country where the support order was issued unless:

The obligee submits to the jurisdiction of a tribunal of this state, either expressly or by defending on the merits of the case without objecting to the jurisdiction at the first available opportunity; or

The foreign tribunal lacks or refuses to exercise jurisdiction to modify its support order or issue a new support order.

If a tribunal of this state does not modify a convention child-support order because the order is not recognized in this state, section 7-1066(3), Idaho Code, applies.

§ 7-1069. Modification of convention child-support order.

A tribunal of this state may not modify a convention child-support order if the obligee remains a resident of the foreign country where the support order was issued unless:

The obligee submits to the jurisdiction of a tribunal of this state, either expressly or by defending on the merits of the case without objecting to the jurisdiction at the first available opportunity; or

The foreign tribunal lacks or refuses to exercise jurisdiction to modify its support order or issue a new support order.

If a tribunal of this state does not modify a convention child-support order because the order is not recognized in this state, section 7-1066(3), Idaho Code, applies.

§ 7-1070. Personal information — Limit on use.

Personal information gathered or transmitted under this chapter may be used only for the purposes for which it was gathered or transmitted.

§ 7-1070. Personal information — Limit on use.

Personal information gathered or transmitted under this chapter may be used only for the purposes for which it was gathered or transmitted.

§ 7-1071. Record in original language — English translation.

A record filed with a tribunal of this state under sections 7-1059 through 7-1071, Idaho Code, must be in the original language and, if not in English, must be accompanied by an English translation.

§ 7-1072. Grounds for rendition.

For purposes of sections 7-1072 and 7-1073, Idaho Code, “governor” includes an individual performing the functions of governor or the executive authority of a state covered by this chapter.

The governor of this state may:

Demand that the governor of another state surrender an individual found in the other state who is charged criminally in this state with having failed to provide for the support of an obligee; or

On the demand of the governor of another state, surrender an individual found in this state who is charged criminally in the other state with having failed to provide for the support of an obligee.

A provision for extradition of individuals not inconsistent with this chapter applies to the demand even if the individual whose surrender is demanded was not in the demanding state when the crime was allegedly committed and has not fled therefrom.

§ 7-1072. Grounds for rendition.

For purposes of sections 7-1072 and 7-1073, Idaho Code, “governor” includes an individual performing the functions of governor or the executive authority of a state covered by this chapter.

The governor of this state may:

Demand that the governor of another state surrender an individual found in the other state who is charged criminally in this state with having failed to provide for the support of an obligee; or

On the demand of the governor of another state, surrender an individual found in this state who is charged criminally in the other state with having failed to provide for the support of an obligee.

A provision for extradition of individuals not inconsistent with this chapter applies to the demand even if the individual whose surrender is demanded was not in the demanding state when the crime was allegedly committed and has not fled therefrom.

§ 7-1073. Conditions of rendition.

Before making a demand that the governor of another state surrender an individual charged criminally in this state with having failed to provide for the support of an obligee, the governor of this state may require a prosecutor of this state to demonstrate that at least 60 days previously the obligee had initiated proceedings for support pursuant to this chapter or that the proceeding would be of no avail.

If, under this chapter or a law substantially similar to this chapter, the governor of another state makes a demand that the governor of this state surrender an individual charged criminally in that state with having failed to provide for the support of a child or other individual to whom a duty of support is owed, the governor may require a prosecutor to investigate the demand and report whether a proceeding for support has been initiated or would be effective. If it appears that a proceeding would be effective but has not been initiated, the governor may delay honoring the demand for a reasonable time to permit the initiation of a proceeding.

If a proceeding for support has been initiated and the individual whose rendition is demanded prevails, the governor may decline to honor the demand. If the petitioner prevails and the individual whose rendition is demanded is subject to a support order, the governor may decline to honor the demand if the individual is complying with the support order.

§ 7-1073. Conditions of rendition.

Before making a demand that the governor of another state surrender an individual charged criminally in this state with having failed to provide for the support of an obligee, the governor of this state may require a prosecutor of this state to demonstrate that at least 60 days previously the obligee had initiated proceedings for support pursuant to this chapter or that the proceeding would be of no avail.

If, under this chapter or a law substantially similar to this chapter, the governor of another state makes a demand that the governor of this state surrender an individual charged criminally in that state with having failed to provide for the support of a child or other individual to whom a duty of support is owed, the governor may require a prosecutor to investigate the demand and report whether a proceeding for support has been initiated or would be effective. If it appears that a proceeding would be effective but has not been initiated, the governor may delay honoring the demand for a reasonable time to permit the initiation of a proceeding.

If a proceeding for support has been initiated and the individual whose rendition is demanded prevails, the governor may decline to honor the demand. If the petitioner prevails and the individual whose rendition is demanded is subject to a support order, the governor may decline to honor the demand if the individual is complying with the support order.

§ 7-1074. Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

§ 7-1074. Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

§ 7-1075. Transitional provision.

This chapter applies to proceedings begun on or after July 1, 2015, to establish a support order or determine parentage of a child or to register, recognize, enforce or modify a prior support order, determination or agreement, whenever issued or entered.

§ 7-1075. Transitional provision.

This chapter applies to proceedings begun on or after July 1, 2015, to establish a support order or determine parentage of a child or to register, recognize, enforce or modify a prior support order, determination or agreement, whenever issued or entered.

§ 7-1076. Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

§ 7-1076. Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

§ 7-1077 — 7-1081. Reciprocal enforcement of support, duties — Conditions of interstate rendition. [Repealed.]

§ 7-1082 — 7-1087. Foreign support orders — Remedies of obligee — Registry of foreign support orders — Representation by state — Treatment of foreign order. [Repealed.]

§ 7-1088, 7-1089. Construction of act — Short title. [Repealed.]